Washington statutes.
RCW 43.08.135

Cash or demand deposits—Duty to maintain—RCW 9A.56.060(1) not deemed violated, when.

The state treasurer shall maintain at all times cash, or demand deposits in qualified public depositaries in an amount needed to meet the operational needs of state government: PROVIDED, That the state treasurer shall not be considered in violation of RCW 9A.56.060(1) if he or she maintains demand accounts in public depositaries in an amount less than all treasury warrants issued and outstanding.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5044; 1983 c 3 s 100; 1972 ex.s. c 145 s 3.]